Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Tennessee Register of Historic Places

4-11-201. Creation — Authority.

The Tennessee historical commission is authorized and directed to maintain and expand a register of districts, sites, buildings, structures and objects significant in Tennessee history, architecture, archaeology, engineering, and culture. This register shall be known as the “Tennessee register of historic places” and shall be the official inventory of irreplaceable historic resources that need to be given maximum encouragement for historic preservation.

Acts 1971, ch. 141, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 4-1111, 4-1112, 4-11-202; Acts 1994, ch. 961, § 2.

Cross-References. Conservation easements, title 66, ch. 9, part 3.

Demolition of historic structures, title 7, ch. 51, part 12.

Historic zoning, title 13, ch. 7, part 4.

Preservation restrictions, title 66, ch. 9, part 1.

4-11-202. Criteria for listing places — Revision.

The following criteria are used in determining eligibility in being placed on the Tennessee register of historic places:

The quality of significance in Tennessee history, architecture, archaeology, engineering and culture is present in districts, sites, buildings, structures and objects that possess integrity of location, design, setting, materials, workmanship, feeling and association, and that:

Are associated with events that have made a significant contribution to the broad patterns of our history;

Are associated with the lives of persons significant in our past;

Embody the distinctive characteristics of a type, period or method of construction or that represent the work of a master, or that possess high artistic values, or that represent a significant and distinguishable entity whose components may lack individual distinction; or

Have yielded, or may be likely to yield, information important in prehistory or history; and

Ordinarily cemeteries, birthplaces or graves of historical figures, properties owned by religious institutions or used for religious purposes, structures that have been moved from their original locations, reconstructed historic buildings, properties primarily commemorative in nature, and properties that have achieved significance within the past fifty (50) years shall not be considered eligible for the Tennessee register. However, such properties will qualify if they are integral parts of districts that do meet the criteria or if they fall within the following categories:

A religious property deriving primary significance from architectural or artistic distinction or historical importance;

A building or structure removed from its original location but that is significant primarily for architectural value, or that is the surviving structure most importantly associated with an historic person or event;

A birthplace or grave of an historical figure of outstanding importance, if there is no other appropriate site or building directly associated with such historical figure's productive life;

A cemetery that derives its primary significance from graves of persons of transcendent importance, from age, from distinctive design features, or from association with historic events;

A reconstructed building when accurately executed in a suitable environment and presented in a dignified manner as part of a restoration master plan, and when no other building or structure with the same association has survived;

A property primarily commemorative in intent if design, age, tradition or symbolic value has invested it with its own historical significance; or

A property achieving significance within the past fifty (50) years, if it is of exceptional importance.

Revisions to the criteria in subsection (a) may be made by the Tennessee historical commission in order to enhance the historical quality of the register.

Acts 1971, ch. 141, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A., §§ 4-1113, 4-1114, 4-11-203, 4-11-204; Acts 1994, ch. 961, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-11-202, concerning the authority of the register, was merged into present §4-11-201 in 1994.

4-11-203. Properties listed in national register.

The Tennessee register of historic places shall consist of all properties in Tennessee that are listed on the national register of historic places maintained by the United States department of interior as of July 1, 1994. Properties that are in the future nominated to the national register of historic places shall be also listed in the Tennessee register of historic places as of the date of their acceptance by the keeper of the national register; provided, that the owner or owners of such property have not objected to such listing as provided for in §4-11-204.

Acts 1994, ch. 961, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-11-203, concerning the criteria for listing historic places, was merged with former §4-11-204 and amended to form present §4-11-202 in 1994.

4-11-204. Public and private properties eligible — Notice to owner — Objections.

Both publicly and privately owned property shall be included in the Tennessee register of historic places. However, prior to the inclusion of privately owned property on the Tennessee register of historic places, the owner or owners of such property shall be given the opportunity (including a reasonable period of time) to concur in or object to such listing. If the owner, or in the case of multiple ownership as in an historic district, a majority of owners, object to such listing, the property proposed for listing in the Tennessee register of historic places shall not be listed until such objection is withdrawn.

Acts 1971, ch. 141, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 4-1115, 4-11-205; Acts 1994, ch. 961, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-11-204, concerning revision of criteria, was merged into present §4-11-202 in 1994.

4-11-205. Publication and distribution of register.

The register will be published annually when funds are available, and copies of the register shall be placed in the various planning agencies of the state.

Acts 1971, ch. 141, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 4-1116, 4-11-206; Acts 1994, ch. 961, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-11-205, concerning eligibility of public and private properties, was transferred to §4-11-204 in 1994.

4-11-206. Removal of properties from register.

A property listed in the Tennessee register of historical places may be removed from such listing if it has lost the qualities of historical, architectural, or archaeological significance that made it eligible.

Acts 1971, ch. 141, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 4-1117, 4-11-207; Acts 1994, ch. 961, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-11-206, concerning publication and distribution of register, was transferred to §4-11-205 in 1994.

4-11-207. Keeper of the register.

The executive director of the Tennessee historical commission is designated as keeper of the Tennessee register of historic places.

Acts 1971, ch. 141, § 8; T.C.A., §§ 4-1118, 4-11-208; Acts 1994, ch. 961, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-11-207, concerning withdrawal of properties from the register, was transferred to §4-11-206 in 1994.

There is no statutory provision for the executive director of the Tennessee historical commission other than the general provisions of §4-11-105 authorizing the commission to create such positions and employ such personnel as are deemed necessary to conduct its affairs.

4-11-208. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-11-208, concerning the keeper of the register of historic places, was transferred to §4-11-207 in 1994.

4-11-209. Polk grave site — Jackson statue.

Notwithstanding any provision of the law or of this part to the contrary, the grave site of James K. Polk shall not be relocated unless the proposed relocation is approved in advance by a duly adopted joint resolution of the general assembly.

Nothing contained within this part shall be construed to prohibit the transfer of any statue of Andrew Jackson, currently placed upon the grounds of the state capitol building, to the Jackson homeplace, the Hermitage.

Acts 1981, ch. 54, §§ 6, 7; 1998, ch. 572, § 3; T.C.A. §4-11-306.